Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 58.17.020 and 2025 c 271 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter clearly requires otherwise, the words or phrases defined in this section shall have the indicated meanings.(1) "Binding site plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by local ordinance which: (a) Identifies and shows the areas and locations of all streets, roads, improvements, utilities, open spaces, and any other matters specified by local regulations; (b) contains inscriptions or attachments setting forth such appropriate limitations and conditions for the use of the land as are established by the local government body having authority to approve the site plan; and (c) contains provisions making any development be in conformity with the site plan.(2) "Block" is a group of lots((,))or tracts((, or parcels)) within well defined and fixed boundaries.(3) "Clear and objective design and development standards" means locally adopted development regulations that involve no personal or subjective judgment by a public official, and are ascertainable by reference to measurable written or graphic criteria available and knowable to the permit applicant, the public, and public officials prior to submittal.(4) "County auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.(5) "County commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW or the body assigned such duties under a county charter.(6) "County road engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40 RCW or the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.(7) "County treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.(8) "Dedication" is the deliberate appropriation of land by an owner for any general and public uses, reserving to himself or herself no other rights than such as are compatible with the full exercise and enjoyment of the public uses to which the property has been devoted. The intention to dedicate shall be evidenced by the owner by the presentment for filing of a final plat or short plat showing the dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public shall be evidenced by the approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate governmental unit.A dedication of an area of less than two acres for use as a public park may include a designation of a name for the park, in honor of a deceased individual of good character.(9) "Final plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and dedication prepared for filing for record with the county auditor and containing all elements and requirements set forth in this chapter and in local regulations adopted under this chapter.(10) "Lot" is a fractional part of divided lands having fixed boundaries, being of sufficient area and dimension to meet ((minimum zoning requirements for width and area. The term shall include tracts or parcels))applicable development regulations.(11) "Parent lot" means a residential lot that is subdivided into unit lots through the unit lot subdivision process.(12) "Planning commission" means that body as defined in chapter 36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63 RCW as designated by the legislative body to perform a planning function or that body assigned such duties and responsibilities under a city or county charter.(13) "Plat" is a map or representation of a subdivision, showing thereon the division of a tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks, streets and alleys, or other divisions and dedications.(14) "Preliminary plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a proposed subdivision showing the general layout of streets and alleys, lots, blocks, and other elements of a subdivision consistent with the requirements of this chapter. The preliminary plat shall be the basis for the approval or disapproval of the general layout of a subdivision.(15) (("Short plat" is the map or representation of a short subdivision.(16) "Short subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into four or fewer lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the purpose of sale, lease, or transfer of ownership. However, the legislative authority of any city or town may by local ordinance increase the number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a maximum of nine. The legislative authority of any county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations in compliance with chapter 36.70A RCW may by ordinance increase the number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a maximum of nine in any urban growth area.(17))) "Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into ((five or more)) lots, tracts, ((parcels, sites))blocks, or divisions for the purpose of sale, lease, or transfer of ownership((, except as provided in subsection (16) of this section)).(((18)))(16) "Unit lot" means a subdivided lot within a residential development as created from a parent lot and approved through the unit lot subdivision process.(((19)))(17) "Unit lot subdivision" means a subdivision ((or short subdivision)) proposed as part of a residential development project that meets the development standards applicable to the parent lot at the time the application is vested, but which may result in development on one or more individual unit lots becoming nonconforming as to specified land use and development standards based on the analysis of the individual unit lot. By June 30, 2026, all unit lot subdivisions shall require notification to purchasers of their legal status as further described in RCW 58.17.060.(18) "Administrative personnel" means the position, employee, or qualified third party designated by the city, town, or county in its development regulations to make a decision on an application subject to this chapter.(19) "Development regulation" or "regulation" have the meaning as set forth in RCW 36.70A.030.(20) "Parcel" means an area of land having fixed boundaries that is subdivided into lots, tracts, and blocks.(21) "Tract" means a fractional part of divided lands having fixed boundaries that is dedicated or reserved for a specific use as specified on a preliminary plat, final plat, or binding site plan, such as drainage facilities, open space or native growth protection area, critical areas and associated buffers, parks, recreation facilities, and landscaping.Sec. 2. RCW 58.17.040 and 2025 c 208 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:(1) Cemeteries and other burial plots while used for that purpose;(2) Divisions of land into lots or tracts each of which is one-one hundred twenty-eighth of a section of land or larger, or five acres or larger if the land is not capable of description as a fraction of a section of land, unless the governing authority of the city, town, or county in which the land is situated shall have adopted a subdivision ordinance requiring plat approval of such divisions: PROVIDED, That for purposes of computing the size of any lot under this item which borders on a street or road, the lot size shall be expanded to include that area that would be bounded by the center line of the road or street and the side lot lines of the lot running perpendicular to such center line;(3) Divisions made by testamentary provisions, or the laws of descent;(4) Divisions of land into lots or tracts classified for industrial or commercial use when the city, town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local regulations. For the purposes of this section, commercially zoned property includes property that is zoned to permit or conditionally permit any multifamily residential uses;(5) A division for the purpose of lease when no residential structure other than mobile homes, tiny houses or tiny houses with wheels as defined in RCW 35.21.686, or travel trailers are permitted to be placed upon the land when the city, town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local regulations;(6) A division made for the purpose of alteration by adjusting boundary lines, between platted or unplatted lots or both, which does not ((create)): (a) Create any additional lot, tract, ((parcel, site,)) or division ((nor create)); (b) create any lot, tract, ((parcel, site,)) or division which contains insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum requirements for width and area for a building site under applicable development regulations; or (c) create any lot, tract, or division that is not buildable according to locally adopted development regulations for critical areas, shorelines, stormwater, setbacks, impervious surface areas, or building coverage standards;(7) Divisions of land into lots or tracts if: (a) Such division is the result of subjecting a portion of a parcel or tract of land to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW subsequent to the recording of a binding site plan for all such land; (b) the improvements constructed or to be constructed thereon are required by the provisions of the binding site plan to be included in one or more condominiums or owned by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their owners' associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial interest; (c) a city, town, or county has approved the binding site plan for all such land; (d) such approved binding site plan is recorded in the county or counties in which such land is located; and (e) the binding site plan contains thereon the following statement: "All development and use of the land described herein shall be in accordance with this binding site plan, as it may be amended with the approval of the city, town, or county having jurisdiction over the development of such land, and in accordance with such other governmental permits, approvals, regulations, requirements, and restrictions that may be imposed upon such land and the development and use thereof. Upon completion, the improvements on the land shall be included in one or more condominiums or owned by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their owners' associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial interest. This binding site plan shall be binding upon all now or hereafter having any interest in the land described herein." The binding site plan may, but need not, depict or describe the boundaries of the lots or tracts resulting from subjecting a portion of the land to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW. A site plan shall be deemed to have been approved if the site plan was approved by a city, town, or county: (i) In connection with the final approval of a subdivision plat or planned unit development with respect to all of such land; or (ii) in connection with the issuance of building permits or final certificates of occupancy with respect to all of such land; or (iii) if not approved pursuant to (i) and (ii) of this subsection (7)(e), then pursuant to such other procedures as such city, town, or county may have established for the approval of a binding site plan;(8) A division for the purpose of leasing land for facilities providing personal wireless services while used for that purpose. "Personal wireless services" means any federally licensed personal wireless service. "Facilities" means unstaffed facilities that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of wireless communication services including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support structures;(9) A division of land into lots or tracts of less than three acres that is recorded in accordance with chapter 58.09 RCW and is used or to be used for the purpose of establishing a site for construction and operation of consumer-owned or investor-owned electric utility facilities. For purposes of this subsection, "electric utility facilities" means unstaffed facilities, except for the presence of security personnel, that are used for or in connection with or to facilitate the transmission, distribution, sale, or furnishing of electricity including, but not limited to, electric power substations. This subsection does not exempt a division of land from the zoning and permitting laws and regulations of cities, towns, counties, and municipal corporations. Furthermore, this subsection only applies to electric utility facilities that will be placed into service to meet the electrical needs of a utility's existing and new customers. New customers are defined as electric service locations not already in existence as of the date that electric utility facilities subject to the provisions of this subsection are planned and constructed; and(10) A division of land into lots or tracts of less than two acres that is recorded in accordance with chapter 58.09 RCW and is used or to be used for the purpose of establishing a site for construction and operation of a rural fire district station, provided the proposed lots or tracts contain sufficient area and dimensions to meet minimum building site width and area requirements, and appropriate provisions are made for potable water supplies and sanitary wastes.Sec. 3. RCW 58.17.040 and 2025 c 208 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:(1) Cemeteries and other burial plots while used for that purpose;(2) Divisions of land into lots or tracts each of which is one-one hundred twenty-eighth of a section of land or larger, or five acres or larger if the land is not capable of description as a fraction of a section of land, unless the governing authority of the city, town, or county in which the land is situated shall have adopted a subdivision ordinance requiring plat approval of such divisions: PROVIDED, That for purposes of computing the size of any lot under this item which borders on a street or road, the lot size shall be expanded to include that area that would be bounded by the center line of the road or street and the side lot lines of the lot running perpendicular to such center line;(3) Divisions made by testamentary provisions, or the laws of descent;(4) Divisions of land into lots or tracts classified for industrial or commercial use when the city, town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local regulations. For the purposes of this section, commercially zoned property includes property that is zoned to permit or conditionally permit any multifamily residential uses;(5) A division for the purpose of lease when no residential structure other than mobile homes, tiny houses or tiny houses with wheels as defined in RCW 35.21.686, or travel trailers are permitted to be placed upon the land when the city, town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local regulations;(6) A division made for the purpose of alteration by adjusting boundary lines, between platted or unplatted lots or both, which does not ((create)): (a) Create any additional lot, tract, ((parcel, site,)) or division ((nor create)); (b) create any lot, tract, ((parcel, site,)) or division which contains insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum requirements for width and area for a building site under applicable development regulations; or (c) create any lot, tract, or division that is not buildable according to locally adopted development regulations for critical areas, shorelines, stormwater, setbacks, impervious surface areas, or building coverage standards;(7) Divisions of land into lots or tracts if: (a) Such division is the result of subjecting a portion of a parcel or tract of land to chapter 64.90 RCW subsequent to the recording of a binding site plan for all such land; (b) the improvements constructed or to be constructed thereon are required by the provisions of the binding site plan to be included in one or more condominiums, cooperatives, or owned by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their owners associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial interest; (c) a city, town, or county has approved the binding site plan for all such land; (d) such approved binding site plan is recorded in the county or counties in which such land is located; and (e) the binding site plan contains thereon the following statement: "All development and use of the land described herein shall be in accordance with this binding site plan, as it may be amended with the approval of the city, town, or county having jurisdiction over the development of such land, and in accordance with such other governmental permits, approvals, regulations, requirements, and restrictions that may be imposed upon such land and the development and use thereof. Upon completion, the improvements on the land shall be included in one or more condominiums, cooperatives, or owned by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their owners associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial interest. This binding site plan shall be binding upon all now or hereafter having any interest in the land described herein." The binding site plan may, but need not, depict or describe the boundaries of the lots or tracts resulting from subjecting a portion of the land to chapter 64.90 RCW. A site plan shall be deemed to have been approved if the site plan was approved by a city, town, or county: (i) In connection with the final approval of a subdivision plat or planned unit development with respect to all of such land; or (ii) in connection with the issuance of building permits or final certificates of occupancy with respect to all of such land; or (iii) if not approved pursuant to (i) and (ii) of this subsection (7)(e), then pursuant to such other procedures as such city, town, or county may have established for the approval of a binding site plan;(8) A division for the purpose of leasing land for facilities providing personal wireless services while used for that purpose. "Personal wireless services" means any federally licensed personal wireless service. "Facilities" means unstaffed facilities that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of wireless communication services including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support structures;(9) A division of land into lots or tracts of less than three acres that is recorded in accordance with chapter 58.09 RCW and is used or to be used for the purpose of establishing a site for construction and operation of consumer-owned or investor-owned electric utility facilities. For purposes of this subsection, "electric utility facilities" means unstaffed facilities, except for the presence of security personnel, that are used for or in connection with or to facilitate the transmission, distribution, sale, or furnishing of electricity including, but not limited to, electric power substations. This subsection does not exempt a division of land from the zoning and permitting laws and regulations of cities, towns, counties, and municipal corporations. Furthermore, this subsection only applies to electric utility facilities that will be placed into service to meet the electrical needs of a utility's existing and new customers. New customers are defined as electric service locations not already in existence as of the date that electric utility facilities subject to the provisions of this subsection are planned and constructed; and(10) A division of land into lots or tracts of less than two acres that is recorded in accordance with chapter 58.09 RCW and is used or to be used for the purpose of establishing a site for construction and operation of a rural fire district station, provided the proposed lots or tracts contain sufficient area and dimensions to meet minimum building site width and area requirements, and appropriate provisions are made for potable water supplies and sanitary wastes.Sec. 4. RCW 58.17.060 and 2025 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislative body of a city, town, or county shall adopt regulations and procedures, and appoint administrative personnel for the summary review and approval of ((short)) plats and ((short)) subdivisions or alteration or vacation thereof. When an alteration or vacation involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation shall be processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations shall be adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a ((short)) plat and ((short))a subdivision may be approved only if written findings that are appropriate, as provided in RCW 58.17.110, are made by the administrative personnel((, and may contain wholly different requirements than those governing the approval of preliminary and final plats of subdivisions and may require surveys and monumentations and shall require filing of a short plat, or alteration or vacation thereof, for record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED, That such regulations must contain a requirement that land in short subdivisions may not be further divided in any manner within a period of five years without the filing of a final plat, except that when the short plat contains fewer than four parcels, nothing in this section shall prevent the owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the five-year period to create up to a total of four lots within the original short plat boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such regulations are not required to contain a penalty clause as provided in RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for wholly injunctive relief.An ordinance requiring a survey shall require that the survey be completed and filed with the application for approval of the short subdivision.(2) Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat regulations and procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section provisions for considering sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students who walk to and from school)).(b) A city, town, or county may not require a public predecision meeting or hearing, or any design review other than administrative design review, except for those required to comply with state law, including chapter 90.58 RCW. A preapplication conference with the city, town, or county may only be required consistent with RCW 36.70B.070(5).(c) If an applicant for preliminary plat approval also submits related applications for approval of rezones, variances, planned unit developments, site plan approvals, development agreements, and any other similar quasi-judicial or administrative actions, then all such applications must be processed concurrently with the preliminary plat application to the extent that procedural requirements applicable to these actions allow for concurrent processing. Upon filing a complete application for preliminary plat approval, the local government shall provide notice to adjacent landowners as provided in development regulations adopted by the city, town, or county pursuant to chapter 36.70B RCW. For purposes of this section, adjacent landowners are the owners of real property, as shown by the records of the county assessor, located within 250 feet of any portion of the boundary of the proposed subdivision. If the owner of the real property which is proposed to be subdivided owns another parcel or parcels of real property that lie adjacent to the real property proposed to be subdivided, notice under this section must be given to owners of real property located within 250 feet of any portion of the boundaries of such adjacently located parcels.(d) A public hearing may not be required for approval of a plat application for a proposed subdivision except as provided herein. A city, town, or county may provide for a public hearing.(((3)))(2) All cities and towns located in a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt or enact procedures for unit lot subdivisions. Portions of the parent lot not subdivided for individual unit lots shall be owned in common by the owners of the individual unit lots, or by a homeowners' association comprised of the owners of the individual unit lots.(a) These procedures shall include, at a minimum, the requirement that prominent informational notes be placed on the unit lot subdivision's plat, and recorded in the county or counties in which such land is located, to acknowledge each of the following:(i) Approval of the design and layout of the unit lot's housing development project was granted based on detailed review of that specified project, as a whole, on the parent lot, including specific reference to the applicable permit or file number for that specified project;(ii)âSubsequent subdivision actions, additions, or modifications to the unit lot housing development project's structures may not create or increase any nonconformity of the parent lot as a whole, and shall conform to the approved unit lot housing development project or to the land use and development standards in effect at the time of the proposed actions, additions, or modifications;(iii)âIf a structure or portion of a structure within the unit lot housing development project has been damaged or destroyed, any repair, reconstruction, or replacement of any structure shall conform to the approved unit lot housing development project or to the land use and development standards in effect at the time the proposed repair, reconstruction, or replacement project's permit application becomes vested; and(iv)âAdditional development or redevelopment of the individual unit lots may be limited as a result of the application of development standards to the parent lot.(b) These procedures shall also:(i) Not require any public predecision meeting or hearing, nor any design review other than administrative design review, except for those required to comply with state law, including chapter 90.58 RCW. A city must ensure that the community and property owners within 250 feet of the unit lot to be subdivided are provided notice consistent with RCW 36.70B.110 of how to provide written comments to the administrative decision maker, including through notice posted on the closest public sidewalk or roadway;(ii) Apply only clear and objective design and development standards;(iii) Be logically integrated with the application, review, and approval procedures that apply to the underlying unit lot housing development project to the greatest extent feasible; and(iv) Be specifically subject to the maximum time period for local government actions as set forth in RCW 36.70B.080, unless extended pursuant to project-specific mutual agreement as permitted by RCW 36.70B.080.(c) After the deadlines in (e) of this subsection, no city or town subject to this section may decline to accept, process, or approve an application for a unit lot subdivision, consistent with the procedural requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection, solely because that city or town has not completed adoption or enactment of the procedures required under this section.(d) Nothing in this section:(i) Prohibits a city or county from applying public health, safety, building code, and environmental permitting requirements to a development project that is subject to or integrated with a unit lot subdivision process;(ii) Requires a city or county to authorize a development project or a unit lot subdivision in a location where development is restricted under other laws, rules, or ordinances, such as in locations where development is limited as a result of physical proximity to on-site sewage system infrastructure, critical areas, or other unsuitable physical characteristics of a property.(e) Cities and towns that are required to submit their next comprehensive plan update in 2027 pursuant to RCW 36.70A.130 must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, the requirements of this section in their next comprehensive plan update. All other cities and towns must implement the requirements of this section within two years of July 27, 2025.(f) Nothing in this subsection alters the vesting requirements set forth in RCW 58.17.033.Sec. 5. RCW 58.17.095 and 1986 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:((A))(1)(a) Any county, city, or town that is not required by this chapter to approve a preliminary plat application administratively without a public hearing may adopt an ordinance providing for the administrative review of a preliminary plat without a public hearing by adopting an ordinance providing for such administrative review. The ordinance may specify a threshold number of lots in a subdivision above which a public hearing must be held, and may specify other factors which necessitate the holding of a public hearing. ((The administrative review process shall include the following minimum conditions:(1)))(b) The notice requirements ((of RCW 58.17.090 shall be followed, except that the publication shall be made within ten days of the filing of the application. Additionally, at least ten days after the filing of the application notice both shall be: (a) Posted on or around the land proposed to be subdivided in at least five conspicuous places designed to attract public awareness of the proposal; and (b) mailed to the owner of each lot or parcel of property located within at least three hundred feet of the site. The applicant shall provide the county, city, or town with a list of such property owners and their addresses. The notice shall include notification that no public hearing will be held on the application, except as provided by this section. The notice shall set out the procedures and time limitations for persons to require a public hearing and make comments.(2) Any person shall have a period of twenty days from the date of the notice to comment upon the proposed preliminary plat. All comments received shall be provided to the applicant. The applicant has seven days from receipt of the comments to respond thereto.(3) A public hearing on the proposed subdivision shall be held if any person files a request for a hearing with the county, city, or town within twenty-one days of the publishing of such notice. If such a hearing is requested, notice requirements for the public hearing shall be in conformance with RCW 58.17.090, and the ninety-day period for approval or disapproval of the proposed subdivision provided for in RCW 58.17.140 shall commence with the date of the filing of the request for a public hearing. Any hearing ordered under this subsection shall be conducted by the planning commission or hearings officer as required by county or city ordinance.(4) On its own initiative within twenty-one days of the filing of the request for approval of the subdivision, the governing body, or a designated employee or official, of the county, city, or town, shall be authorized to cause a public hearing to be held on the proposed subdivision within ninety days of the filing of the request for the subdivision.(5) If the public hearing is waived as provided in this section, the planning commission or planning agency shall complete the review of the proposed preliminary plat and transmit its recommendation to the legislative body as provided in RCW 58.17.100))of the administrative review process must be set forth in development regulations adopted by the city, town, or county pursuant to chapter 36.70B RCW, which may include, but are not limited to: (a) Requiring posting notice on or around the land proposed to be subdivided to attract public awareness of the proposal; (b) mailing notice of the proposed subdivision to neighboring property owners located within at least 200 feet of the site, including notification that no public hearing will be held on the application, except as provided by this section; and (c) the process and time requirements for the public to comment on the proposed subdivision and for the applicant to respond to the comments in writing.(2) A city, town, or county may specify in its development regulations when a public hearing must be held and, if such a hearing is required, the development regulations must set forth the requirements for notice of the public hearing, by whom the hearing will be conducted, and the procedures for such hearing.Sec. 6. RCW 58.17.110 and 2018 c 1 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The ((city, town, or county legislative body shall inquire into))administrative personnel shall review the public use and interest proposed to be served by the establishment of the subdivision and dedication. ((It shall determine: (a) If appropriate))(b) A subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the administrative personnel make written findings consistent with applicable development regulations that:(i) Appropriate provisions are made for, but not limited to, the public health, safety, and general welfare, for open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider all other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students who ((only)) walk to and from school; and (((b) whether the))(ii) The public interest will be served by the subdivision and dedication.(c) The administrative personnel may impose conditions of approval as necessary to ensure compliance with these standards. Every approval, conditional approval, or denial must be in writing and include findings of fact and conclusions to support the decision. If these findings cannot be made, the application must be denied.(2) ((A proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the city, town, or county legislative body makes written findings that: (a) Appropriate provisions are made for the public health, safety, and general welfare and for such open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and (b) the public use and interest will be served by the platting of such subdivision and dedication. If it finds that the proposed subdivision and dedication make such appropriate provisions and that the public use and interest will be served, then the legislative body shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication.)) Dedication of land to any public body, provision of public improvements to serve the subdivision, and/or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be required as a condition of subdivision approval. Dedications shall be clearly shown on the final plat. No dedication, provision of public improvements, or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that constitutes an unconstitutional taking of private property. ((The legislative body))Approval of any subdivision shall not ((as a condition to the approval of any subdivision require))be conditioned upon obtaining a release from damages to be procured from other property owners.(3) If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park with an area of less than two acres and the donor has designated that the park be named in honor of a deceased individual of good character, the city, town, or county legislative body must adopt the designated name.(4) If water supply is to be provided by a groundwater withdrawal exempt from permitting under RCW 90.44.050, the applicant's compliance with RCW 90.44.050 and with applicable rules adopted pursuant to chapters 90.22 and 90.54 RCW is sufficient in determining appropriate provisions for water supply for a subdivision, dedication((, or short subdivision)) under this chapter.(5) If requested by the administrative personnel, the applicant shall provide written responses to timely submitted public comments prior to issuance of a final decision.Sec. 7. RCW 58.17.120 and 1974 ex.s. c 134 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The city, town, or county ((legislative body))administrative personnel shall consider the physical characteristics of a proposed subdivision site and may disapprove a proposed plat because of flood, inundation, or swamp conditions. Construction of protective improvements may be required as a condition of approval, and such improvements shall be noted on the final plat.No plat shall be approved by any city, town, or county ((legislative authority)) covering any land situated in a flood control zone as provided in chapter 86.16 RCW without the prior written approval of the department of ecology of the state of Washington.Sec. 8. RCW 58.17.130 and 1974 ex.s. c 134 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Local regulations shall provide that in lieu of the completion of the actual construction of any required improvements prior to the approval of a final plat, the city, town, or county ((legislative body)) may accept a bond, in an amount and with surety and conditions satisfactory to it, or other secure method, providing for and securing to the municipality the actual construction and installation of such improvements within a period specified by the city, town, or county ((legislative body))administrative personnel and expressed in the bonds. In addition, local regulations may provide for methods of security, including the posting of a bond securing to the municipality the successful operation of improvements for an appropriate period of time up to two years after final approval. The municipality is hereby granted the power to enforce bonds authorized under this section by all appropriate legal and equitable remedies. Such local regulations may provide that the improvements such as structures, sewers, and water systems shall be designed and certified by or under the supervision of a registered civil engineer prior to the acceptance of such improvements.Sec. 9. RCW 58.17.140 and 2013 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Preliminary plats of any proposed subdivision and dedication shall be approved, disapproved, or returned to the applicant for modification or correction within ninety days from date of filing thereof unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time period or the ninety day limitation is extended to include up to twenty-one days as specified under RCW 58.17.095(3): PROVIDED, That if an environmental impact statement is required as provided in RCW 43.21C.030, the ninety day period shall not include the time spent preparing and circulating the environmental impact statement by the local government agency.(2) Final plats and short plats shall be approved, disapproved, or returned to the applicant within thirty days from the date of filing thereof, unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time period.(3)(a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, a))A final plat meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be submitted to the ((legislative body of the city, town, or county))administrative personnel for approval within ((seven years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the date of preliminary plat approval is on or before December 31, 2014, and within)) five years of the date of preliminary plat approval ((if the date of preliminary plat approval is on or after January 1, 2015)).(((b) A final plat meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be submitted to the legislative body of the city, town, or county for approval within ten years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the project is not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW and the date of preliminary plat approval is on or before December 31, 2007.(4)))(2) Nothing contained in this section shall act to prevent any city, town, or county from adopting by ordinance procedures which would allow extensions of time that may or may not contain additional or altered conditions and requirements.Sec. 10. RCW 58.17.150 and 1983 c 121 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Each preliminary plat submitted for final approval of the ((legislative body))administrative personnel shall be accompanied by the following agencies' recommendations for approval or disapproval:(1) Local health department or other agency furnishing sewage disposal and supplying water as to the adequacy of the proposed means of sewage disposal and water supply;(2) ((Local planning agency or commission,))The administrative personnel charged with the responsibility of reviewing plats and subdivisions, as to compliance with all terms of the preliminary approval of the proposed plat subdivision or dedication;(3) City, town or county engineer.Except as provided in RCW 58.17.140, an agency or person issuing a recommendation for subsequent approval under subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall not modify the terms of its recommendations without the consent of the applicant.Sec. 11. RCW 58.17.165 and 1981 c 293 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:Every final plat ((or short plat)) of a subdivision ((or short subdivision)) filed for record must contain a certificate giving a full and correct description of the lands divided as they appear on the plat ((or short plat)), including a statement that the subdivision ((or short subdivision)) has been made with the free consent and in accordance with the desires of the owner or owners.If the plat ((or short plat)) is subject to a dedication, the certificate or a separate written instrument shall contain the dedication of all streets and other areas to the public, and individual or individuals, religious society or societies or to any corporation, public or private as shown on the plat ((or short plat)) and a waiver of all claims for damages against any governmental authority which may be occasioned to the adjacent land by the established construction, drainage and maintenance of said road. Said certificate or instrument of dedication shall be signed and acknowledged before a notary public by all parties having any ownership interest in the lands subdivided and recorded as part of the final plat.Every plat ((and short plat)) containing a dedication filed for record must be accompanied by a title report confirming that the title of the lands as described and shown on said plat is in the name of the owners signing the certificate or instrument of dedication.An offer of dedication may include a waiver of right of direct access to any street from any property, and if the dedication is accepted, any such waiver is effective. Such waiver may be required by local authorities as a condition of approval. Roads not dedicated to the public must be clearly marked on the face of the plat. Any dedication, donation or grant as shown on the face of the plat shall be considered to all intents and purposes, as a quitclaim deed to the said donee or donees, grantee or grantees for his, her or their use for the purpose intended by the donors or grantors as aforesaid.Sec. 12. RCW 58.17.170 and 2017 c 161 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When the ((legislative body of the city, town, or county, or such other agency as authorized by RCW 58.17.100, finds))administrative personnel find that the subdivision proposed for final plat approval conforms to all terms of the preliminary plat approval, and that said subdivision meets the requirements of this chapter, other applicable state laws, and any local ordinances adopted under this chapter which were in effect at the time of preliminary plat approval, it shall suitably inscribe and execute its written approval on the face of the plat. The original of said final plat shall be filed for record with the county auditor. One reproducible copy shall be furnished to the city, town, or county engineer. One paper copy shall be filed with the county assessor. Paper copies shall be provided to such other agencies as may be required by ordinance.(2)(((a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, any))Any lots in a final plat filed for record shall be a valid land use notwithstanding any change in zoning laws ((for a period of seven years from the date of filing if the date of filing is on or before December 31, 2014, and)) for a period of five years from the date of filing ((if the date of filing is on or after January 1, 2015.(b) Any lots in a final plat filed for record shall be a valid land use notwithstanding any change in zoning laws for a period of ten years from the date of filing if the project is not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW and the date of filing is on or before December 31, 2007)).(3)(((a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, a))A subdivision shall be governed by the terms of approval of the final plat, and the statutes, ordinances, and regulations in effect at the time of approval ((under RCW 58.17.150 (1) and (3) for a period of seven years after final plat approval if the date of final plat approval is on or before December 31, 2014, and)) for a period of five years after final plat approval ((if the date of final plat approval is on or after January 1, 2015)), unless the ((legislative body finds))administrative personnel find that a change in conditions creates a serious threat to the public health or safety in the subdivision.(((b) A subdivision shall be governed by the terms of approval of the final plat, and the statutes, ordinances, and regulations in effect at the time of approval under RCW 58.17.150 (1) and (3) for a period of ten years after final plat approval if the project is not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW and the date of final plat approval is on or before December 31, 2007, unless the legislative body finds that a change in conditions creates a serious threat to the public health or safety in the subdivision.))Sec. 13. RCW 58.17.190 and 2017 c 161 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The county auditor shall refuse to accept any plat for filing until approval of the plat has been given by the ((appropriate legislative body))administrative personnel, or such other agency as authorized by RCW 58.17.100. Should a plat or dedication be filed without such approval, the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the plat is filed shall apply for a writ of mandate in the name of and on behalf of the ((legislative body))city, town, or county required to approve same, directing the auditor and assessor to remove from their files or records the unapproved plat, or dedication of record.Sec. 14. RCW 58.17.195 and 1981 c 293 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:No plat ((or short plat)) may be approved unless the ((city, town, or county makes a formal))administrative personnel make a written finding of fact that the proposed subdivision ((or proposed short subdivision)) is in conformity with any applicable ((zoning ordinance))development regulations or other land use controls ((which may exist)).Sec. 15. RCW 58.17.200 and 1969 ex.s. c 271 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:Whenever any parcel of land is ((divided into five or more lots, tracts, or parcels of land))subdivided into lots, tracts, or blocks in accordance with this chapter and any person, firm, or corporation or any agent of any of them sells or transfers, or offers or advertises for sale or transfer, any such lot, tract, or ((parcel))block without having a final plat of such subdivision filed for record, the prosecuting attorney shall commence an action to restrain and enjoin further subdivisions or sales, or transfers, or offers of sale or transfer and compel compliance with all provisions of this chapter. The costs of such action shall be taxed against the person, firm, corporation or agent selling or transferring the property.Sec. 16. RCW 58.17.212 and 1987 c 354 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Whenever any person is interested in the vacation of any subdivision or portion thereof, or any area designated or dedicated for public use, that person shall file an application for vacation with the legislative authority of the city, town, or county in which the subdivision is located. The application shall set forth the reasons for vacation and shall contain signatures of all parties having an ownership interest in that portion of the subdivision subject to vacation. If the subdivision is subject to restrictive covenants which were filed at the time of the approval of the subdivision, and the application for vacation would result in the violation of a covenant, the application shall contain an agreement signed by all parties subject to the covenants providing that the parties agree to terminate or alter the relevant covenants to accomplish the purpose of the vacation of the subdivision or portion thereof. When the vacation application is specifically for a county road or city or town street, the procedures for road vacation or street vacation in chapter 36.87 or 35.79 RCW shall be utilized for the road or street vacation. When the application is for the vacation of the plat together with the roads and/or streets, the procedure for vacation in this section shall be used, but vacations of streets may not be made that are prohibited under RCW ((35.79.030))35.79.035, and vacations of roads may not be made that are prohibited under RCW 36.87.130.The legislative authority of the city, town, or county shall give notice as provided in ((RCW 58.17.080 and 58.17.090 and))development regulations adopted by the city, town, or county pursuant to chapter 36.70B RCW and, to the extent required under such development regulations, shall conduct a public hearing on the application for a vacation and may approve or deny the application for vacation of the subdivision after determining the public use and interest to be served by the vacation of the subdivision. If any portion of the land contained in the subdivision was dedicated to the public for public use or benefit, such land, if not deeded to the city, town, or county, shall be deeded to the city, town, or county unless the legislative authority shall set forth findings that the public use would not be served in retaining title to those lands.Title to the vacated property shall vest with the rightful owner as shown in the county records. If the vacated land is land that was dedicated to the public, for public use other than a road or street, and the legislative authority has found that retaining title to the land is not in the public interest, title thereto shall vest with the person or persons owning the property on each side thereof, as determined by the legislative authority. When the road or street that is to be vacated was contained wholly within the subdivision and is part of the boundary of the subdivision, title to the vacated road or street shall vest with the owner or owners of property contained within the vacated subdivision.This section shall not be construed as applying to the vacation of any plat of state-granted ((tide or shore lands [tidelands or shorelands]))tidelands or shorelands.Sec. 17. RCW 58.17.215 and 1987 c 354 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:When any person is interested in the alteration of any subdivision or the altering of any portion thereof that includes any area designated or dedicated for public use, except as provided in RCW 58.17.040(6), that person shall submit an application to request the alteration to the legislative authority of the city, town, or county where the subdivision is located. The application shall contain the signatures of the majority of those persons having an ownership interest of lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions in the subject subdivision or portion to be altered. If the subdivision is subject to restrictive covenants which were filed at the time of the approval of the subdivision, and the application for alteration would result in the violation of a covenant, the application shall contain an agreement signed by all parties subject to the covenants providing that the parties agree to terminate or alter the relevant covenants to accomplish the purpose of the alteration of the subdivision or portion thereof.Upon receipt of an application for alteration, the ((legislative body))administrative personnel shall provide notice of the application to all owners of property within the subdivision, and as provided for in RCW ((58.17.080 and 58.17.090. The notice shall either establish a date for a public hearing or provide that a hearing may be requested by a person receiving notice within fourteen days of receipt of the notice))58.17.060. Any notice required by this section must include a description of the proposed alteration, note that there will not be a public hearing, and note that comments are due on the application within the time period established by the city, town, or county pursuant to RCW 36.70B.110(2)(e).The ((legislative body))administrative personnel shall determine the public use and interest in the proposed alteration and may deny or approve the application for alteration. If any land within the alteration is part of an assessment district, any outstanding assessments shall be equitably divided and levied against the remaining lots, parcels, or tracts, or be levied equitably on the lots resulting from the alteration. If any land within the alteration contains a dedication to the general use of persons residing within the subdivision, such land may be altered and divided equitably between the adjacent properties.After approval of the alteration, the ((legislative body))administrative personnel shall order the applicant to produce a revised drawing of the approved alteration of the ((final)) plat ((or short plat)), which after signature of the ((legislative authority))administrative personnel, shall be filed with the county auditor to become the lawful plat of the property.This section shall not be construed as applying to the alteration or replatting of any plat of state-granted ((tide or shore lands [tidelands or shorelands]))tidelands or shorelands.Sec. 18. RCW 58.17.217 and 1987 c 354 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Any hearing required by development regulations adopted by a city, town, or county for the vacation of a subdivision pursuant to RCW 58.17.212((,))or the alteration of a subdivision pursuant to RCW 58.17.215((, or 58.17.060)) may be administered by either a hearings examiner as provided in RCW 58.17.330 or such other administrative personnel designated in development regulations adopted by the city, town, or county.Sec. 19. RCW 58.17.255 and 1987 c 354 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:Whenever a survey of a proposed subdivision ((or short subdivision)) reveals a discrepancy, the discrepancy shall be noted on the face of the final plat ((or short plat)). Any discrepancy shall be disclosed in a title report prepared by a title insurer and issued after the filing of the final plat ((or short plat)). As used in this section, "discrepancy" means: (1) A boundary hiatus; (2) an overlapping boundary; or (3) a physical appurtenance, which indicates encroachment, lines of possession, or conflict of title.Sec. 20. RCW 58.17.280 and 1993 c 486 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Any city, town or county shall, by ordinance, regulate the procedure whereby ((short subdivisions,)) subdivisions, streets, lots and blocks are named and numbered. A lot numbering system and a house address system, however, shall be provided by the municipality for ((short subdivisions and)) subdivisions and must be clearly shown on the ((short plat or)) final plat at the time of approval.Sec. 21. RCW 58.17.310 and 2009 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever a city, town, or county receives an application for the approval of a plat ((of))for a subdivision that lies in whole or in part in an irrigation district organized pursuant to chapter 87.03 RCW, the ((responsible administrator))administrative personnel shall give written notice of the application, including a legal description of the ((short)) subdivision and a location map, to the irrigation district. The irrigation district shall, after receiving the notice, submit to the ((responsible administrator))administrative personnel who furnished the notice a statement with any information or conditions for approval that the irrigation district deems to be necessary regarding the proposed ((division's))subdivision's effect upon the structural integrity, including lateral support, of the irrigation district facilities, other risk exposures, and the safety of the public and irrigation district.(2) In addition to any other requirements imposed by the provisions of this chapter, the ((legislative authority))administrative personnel of any city, town, or county shall not approve a ((short plat or)) final plat, as defined in RCW 58.17.020, for any subdivision, ((short subdivision,)) lot, tract, parcel, or ((site))block which lies in whole or in part in an irrigation district organized pursuant to chapter 87.03 RCW unless there has been provided an irrigation water right-of-way for each portion of the subdivision, lot, tract, block, or parcel of land ((in))within such district. In addition, if the subdivision, ((short subdivision,)) lot, tract, parcel, or ((site))block lies within land within the district classified as irrigable, completed irrigation water distribution facilities for such land may be required by the irrigation district by resolution, bylaw, or rule of general applicability as a condition for approval of the ((short plat or)) final plat ((by the legislative authority of the city, town, or county)). Rights-of-way shall be evidenced by the respective final plats submitted for ((final)) approval ((to the appropriate legislative authority)). In addition, if the subdivision, ((short subdivision,)) lot, tract, parcel, or ((site))block to be ((platted))subdivided is wholly or partially within an irrigation district of two hundred thousand acres or more and has been previously platted by the United States bureau of reclamation as a farm unit in the district, the ((legislative authority))administrative personnel of the city, town, or county shall not approve for such land a ((short plat or)) final plat ((as defined in RCW 58.17.020)) without the approval of the irrigation district and the administrator or manager of the project of the bureau of reclamation, or its successor agency, within which that district lies. Compliance with the requirements of this section together with all other applicable provisions of this chapter shall be a prerequisite, within the expressed purpose of this chapter, to any sale, lease, or development of land in this state.Sec. 22. RCW 58.17.330 and 1995 c 347 s 429 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As an alternative to those provisions of ((this chapter requiring a planning commission to hear and issue recommendations for plat approval))RCW 58.17.212 requiring the legislative body to process an application for a plat vacation, the county or city legislative body may adopt a hearing examiner system and shall specify by ordinance the legal effect of the decisions made by the examiner((. The legal effect of such decisions)), that shall include one of the following:(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the legislative body;(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative body; or(c) The decision may be given the effect of a final decision of the legislative body.The legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed by a hearing examiner.(2) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to support the decision. Each final decision of a hearing examiner, unless a longer period is mutually agreed to by the applicant and the hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following conclusion of all testimony and hearings.Sec. 23. RCW 36.70B.070 and 2023 c 338 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Within 28 calendar days after receiving a project permit application, a local government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a written determination to the applicant((.(b) The written determination))that must state either:(i) That the application is procedurally complete; or(ii) That the application is procedurally incomplete and that the procedural submission requirements ((of the local government)) have not been met. The determination shall ((outline what is))identify the information necessary to make the application procedurally complete.(((c) The number of days shall))(b) For purposes of this section, all time periods must be calculated by ((counting every))using calendar ((day))days.(((d)))(c) To the extent known by the local government, the local government shall identify any other agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may have jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.(2) A project permit application is procedurally complete ((for purposes of this section)) when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the local government, as ((outlined))identified on the project permit application. Additional information ((or)), studies, or project modifications may be required ((or project modifications may be undertaken subsequent to the procedural review of the application by the local government. The))after a determination of completeness. A determination of completeness ((shall))does not preclude the local ((government from requesting))government's ability to request additional information or studies either at the time of the ((notice))determination of completeness or ((subsequently))later if new information is required or if substantial changes in the proposed action occur. However, ((if))once the procedural submission requirements((, as outlined on the project permit application have been provided))have been satisfied, the need for additional information or studies may not delay or preclude a completeness determination.(3) ((The))A determination of completeness may include or be combined with the following:(a) A preliminary determination of those development regulations that will be used for project mitigation;(b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040;(c) Other information the local government chooses to include; or(d) The notice of application ((pursuant to the requirements in))required under RCW 36.70B.110.(4)(a) An application shall be deemed procedurally complete on the 29th day after ((receiving a project permit application under this section))receipt if the local government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that the application is procedurally incomplete as provided in subsection (((1)(b)(ii)))(1)(a)(ii) of this section. ((When the local government does not provide))The absence of a written determination((, they may still seek))of completeness does not limit the local government's ability to request additional information or studies as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.(b) Within 14 calendar days after an applicant ((has submitted to a local government))submits additional information identified by the local government as ((being)) necessary ((for a))to complete the application, the local government shall notify the applicant whether the application is procedurally complete or ((what additional information is necessary))identify any remaining information required.(c) The notice of application required under RCW 36.70B.110 shall be provided within 14 calendar days after the determination of completeness ((pursuant to RCW 36.70B.110)).(5) If a preapplication conference is required for a complete application, then the preapplication conference must:(a) Include discussion of the city, town, or county requirements for obtaining a determination of completeness and the applicable review processes, permit types, and development regulations; and(b) Answer questions from the applicant to facilitate preparation and submittal of a complete application.Sec. 24. RCW 36.70B.080 and 2025 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 must establish and implement time periods for local government actions for each type of project permit application and provide timely and predictable procedures to determine whether a completed project permit application meets the requirements of those development regulations. Except for modifications by a jurisdiction provided for in (e) of this subsection, the time periods for local government actions for each type of complete project permit application or project type may not exceed those specified in this section.(b) For project permits submitted after January 1, 2025, the development regulations must, for each type of permit application, specify the contents of a completed project permit application necessary for the complete compliance with the time periods and procedures.(c) A jurisdiction may exclude certain permit types and timelines for processing project permit applications as provided for in RCW 36.70B.140.(d) The time periods for local government action to issue a final decision for each type of complete project permit application or project type subject to this chapter should not exceed the following time periods unless modified by the local government pursuant to this section or RCW 36.70B.140:(i) For project permits which do not require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110, a local government must issue a final decision within 65 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070;(ii) For project permits which require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110, a local government must issue a final decision within 100 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070, provided a project permit application for preliminary plat approval pursuant to chapter 58.17 RCW is subject to the time period in (d)(iii) of this subsection notwithstanding an open record hearing not being required; and(iii) For project permits which require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110 and a public hearing, a local government must issue a final decision within 170 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070.(e) A jurisdiction may modify the provisions in (d) of this subsection to add permit types not identified, change the permit names or types in each category, address how consolidated review time periods may be different than permits submitted individually, and provide for how projects of a certain size or type may be differentiated, including by differentiating between permits that include a residential land use as a principal use of the land and permits that do not. Unless otherwise provided for the consolidated review of more than one permit, the time period for a final decision shall be the longest of the permit time periods identified in (d) of this subsection or as amended by a local government.(f) If a local government does not adopt an ordinance or resolution modifying the provisions in (d) of this subsection, the time periods in (d) of this subsection apply.(g) The number of days an application is in review with the county or city shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a final decision is issued on the project permit application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day and excluding the following time periods:(i) Any period between the day that the county or city has notified the applicant, in writing, that additional information is required to further process the application and the day when responsive information is resubmitted by the applicant;(ii) Any period after an applicant informs the local government, in writing, that they would like to temporarily suspend review of the project permit application until the time that the applicant notifies the local government, in writing, that they would like to resume the application. A local government may set conditions for the temporary suspension of a permit application; and(iii) Any period after an administrative appeal is filed until the administrative appeal is resolved and any additional time period provided by the administrative appeal has expired.(h) The time periods for a local government to process a permit shall start over if an applicant proposes a change in use that adds or removes commercial or residential elements from the original application that would make the application fail to meet the determination of procedural completeness for the new use, as required by the local government under RCW 36.70B.070.(i) If, at any time, an applicant informs the local government, in writing, that the applicant would like to temporarily suspend the review of the project for more than 60 days, or if an applicant is not responsive for more than 60 consecutive days after the county or city has notified the applicant, in writing, that additional information is required to further process the application, an additional 30 days may be added to the time periods for local government action to issue a final decision for each type of project permit that is subject to this chapter. Any written notice from the local government to the applicant that additional information is required to further process the application must include a notice that nonresponsiveness for 60 consecutive days may result in 30 days being added to the time for review. For the purposes of this subsection, "nonresponsiveness" means that an applicant is not making demonstrable progress on providing additional requested information to the local government, or that there is no ongoing communication from the applicant to the local government on the applicant's ability or willingness to provide the additional information.(j) Annual amendments to the comprehensive plan are not subject to the requirements of this section.(k) A county's or city's adoption of a resolution or ordinance to implement this subsection shall not be subject to appeal under chapter 36.70A RCW unless the resolution or ordinance modifies the time periods provided in (d) of this subsection by providing for a review period of more than 170 days for any project permit.(l)(i) When permit time periods provided for in (d) of this subsection, as may be amended by a local government, and as may be extended as provided for in (i) of this subsection, are not met, a portion of the permit fee must be refunded to the applicant as provided in this subsection. A local government may provide for the collection of only 80 percent of a permit fee initially, and for the collection of the remaining balance if the permitting time periods are met. The portion of the fee refunded for missing time periods shall be:(A) 10 percent if the final decision of the project permit application was made after the applicable deadline but the period from the passage of the deadline to the time of issuance of the final decision did not exceed 20 percent of the original time period; or(B) 20 percent if the period from the passage of the deadline to the time of the issuance of the final decision exceeded 20 percent of the original time period.(ii) Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.160, the provisions in (([(l)]))(l)(i) of this subsection are not applicable to cities and counties which have implemented at least three of the options in RCW 36.70B.160(1) (a) through (j) at the time an application is deemed procedurally complete.(2)(a) Counties subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 and the cities within those counties that have populations of at least 20,000 must, for each type of permit application, identify the total number of project permit applications for which decisions are issued according to the provisions of this chapter. For each type of project permit application identified, these counties and cities must establish and implement a deadline for issuing a notice of final decision as required by subsection (1) of this section and minimum requirements for applications to be deemed complete under RCW 36.70B.070 as required by subsection (1) of this section.(b) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection also must prepare an annual performance report that includes information outlining time periods for certain permit types associated with housing. The report must provide:(i) Permit time periods for certain permit processes in the county or city in relation to those established under this section, including whether the county or city has established shorter time periods than those provided in this section;(ii) The total number of decisions issued during the year for the following permit types: Preliminary subdivisions, final subdivisions, binding site plans, permit processes associated with the approval of multifamily housing, and construction plan review for each of these permit types when submitted separately;(iii) The total number of decisions for each permit type which included consolidated project permit review, such as concurrent review of a rezone or construction plans;(iv) The average number of days from a submittal to a decision being issued for the project permit types listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection. This shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a decision is issued on the application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day;(v) The total number of days each project permit application of a type listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection was in review with the county or city. This shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a final decision is issued on the application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day. The days the application is in review with the county or city does not include the time periods in subsection (1)(g)(i) through (iii) of this section;(vi) The total number of days that were excluded from the time period calculation under subsection (1)(g)(i) through (iii) of this section for each project permit application of a type listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection.(c) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection must:(i) Post the annual performance report through the county's or city's website; and(ii) Submit the annual performance report to the department of commerce by March 1st each year.(d) No later than July 1st each year, the department of commerce shall publish a report which includes the annual performance report data for each county and city subject to the requirements of this subsection and a list of those counties and cities whose time periods are shorter than those provided for in this section.The annual report must also include key metrics and findings from the information collected.(e) The initial annual report required under this subsection must be submitted to the department of commerce by March 1, 2025, and must include information from permitting in 2024.(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or city from extending a deadline for issuing a decision for a specific project permit application for any reasonable and certain period of time specified and mutually agreed upon in writing by the applicant and the local government. No local government may require or request an extension of an applicable deadline for issuance of a decision for a specific project permit application as a condition or an option at initial submission of a project permit application.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 25. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 58.17.070 (Preliminary plat of subdivisions and dedicationsâSubmission for approvalâProcedure) and 1981 c 293 s 4 & 1969 ex.s. c 271 s 7;(2) RCW 58.17.080 (Filing of preliminary platâNotice) and 1982 c 23 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 271 s 8;(3) RCW 58.17.090 (Notice of public hearing) and 1995 c 347 s 426, 1981 c 293 s 5, 1974 ex.s. c 134 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 271 s 9;(4) RCW 58.17.092 (Public noticeâIdentification of affected property) and 1995 c 347 s 427 & 1988 c 168 s 12;(5) RCW 58.17.100 (Review of preliminary plats by planning commission or agencyâRecommendationâChange by legislative bodyâProcedureâApproval) and 2017 c 161 s 1, 1995 c 347 s 428, 1981 c 293 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 271 s 10;(6) RCW 58.17.155 (Short subdivision adjacent to state highwayâNotice to department of transportation) and 1984 c 47 s 1; and(7) RCW 58.17.225 (Easement over public open spaceâMay be exempt from RCW 58.17.215âHearingâNotice) and 1995 c 32 s 1.Sec. 26. RCW 36.70B.160 and 2023 c 338 s 8 and 2023 c 333 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Each local government is encouraged to adopt further project review and code provisions to provide prompt, coordinated, and objective review and ensure accountability to applicants and the public by:(a) Expediting review for project permit applications for projects that are consistent with adopted development regulations or that include dwelling units that are affordable to low-income or moderate-income households;(b) Imposing reasonable fees, consistent with RCW 82.02.020, on applicants for permits or other governmental approvals to cover the cost to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW. The fees imposed may not include a fee for the cost of processing administrative appeals. Nothing in this subsection limits the ability of a county or city to impose a fee for the processing of administrative appeals as otherwise authorized by law;(c) Entering into an interlocal agreement with another jurisdiction to share permitting staff and resources;(d) Maintaining and budgeting for on-call permitting assistance for when permit volumes or staffing levels change rapidly;(e) Having new positions budgeted that are contingent on increased permit revenue;(f) Adopting development regulations which only require public hearings for permit applications that are required to have a public hearing by statute;(g) Adopting development regulations which make preapplication meetings optional rather than a requirement of permit application submittal;(h) Adopting development regulations which make housing types an outright permitted use in all zones where the housing type is permitted;(i) Adopting a program to allow for outside professionals with appropriate professional licenses to certify components of applications consistent with their license((; or))(j) Meeting with the applicant to attempt to resolve outstanding issues during the review process. The meeting must be scheduled within 14 days of a second request for corrections during permit review. If the meeting cannot resolve the issues and a local government proceeds with a third request for additional information or corrections, the local government must approve or deny the application upon receiving the additional information or corrections; or(k) Adopting procedures to allow an applicant seeking approval of a preliminary plat under chapter 58.17 RCW to submit civil engineering permit applications and supporting technical reports for required infrastructure for review prior to a final decision on the preliminary plat application, provided that no civil engineering permit may be issued until the preliminary plat is approved.(2)(a) After January 1, 2026, a county or city must adopt additional measures under subsection (1) of this section at the time of its next comprehensive plan update under RCW 36.70A.130 if it meets the following conditions:(i) The county or city has adopted at least three project review and code provisions under subsection (1) of this section more than five years prior; and(ii) The county or city is not meeting the permitting deadlines established in RCW 36.70B.080 at least half of the time over the period since its most recent comprehensive plan update under RCW 36.70A.130.(b) A city or county that is required to adopt new measures under (a) of this subsection but fails to do so becomes subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70B.080(1)(l), notwithstanding RCW 36.70B.080(1)(l)(ii).(3) Nothing in this chapter is intended or shall be construed to prevent a local government from requiring a preapplication conference or a public meeting by rule, ordinance, or resolution, where otherwise required by applicable state law provided that such conference or meeting complies with RCW 36.70B.070(5).(4) Each local government shall adopt procedures to monitor and enforce permit decisions and conditions.(5) Nothing in this chapter modifies any independent statutory authority for a government agency to appeal a project permit issued by a local government.(6) For the purposes of this section:(a) A dwelling unit is affordable if it requires payment of monthly housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no more than 30 percent of the family's income.(b) "Dwelling unit" means a residential living unit that provides complete independent living facilities for one or more persons and that includes permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, and that is sold or rented separately from other dwelling units.(c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than 80 percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development, or less than 80 percent of the city's median income if the project is located in the city, the city has median income of more than 20 percent above the county median income, and the city has adopted an alternative local median income.(d) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 120 percent of the median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development, or less than 120 percent of the city's median income if the project is located in the city, the city has median income of more than 20 percent above the county median income, and the city has adopted an alternative local median income.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 27. Section 2 of this act expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 28. Section 3 of this act takes effect January 1, 2028.--- END ---